Massachusetts, session 194th, H1836.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 140 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 207. (a) Whoever possess, carries, or owns a firearm, rifle or shotgun without a
liability policy or bond or deposit required by the provisions of this chapter which has not been
provided and maintained in accordance therewith shall be punished by a fine of not less than five
hundred nor more than five thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one year in a
house of correction, or both such fine and imprisonment. This section shall not apply to a person
who possesses a firearm, rifle, or shotgun on a temporary basis while on the premises of a
licensed gun club.
(b) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate regulations set forth for the
minimum terms of liability insurance policies which shall satisfy the requirements of this section.
of 1